Wyoming, session 2026, HB0132.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 14-3-311 and 39-18-112 through
39-18-115 are created to read:

14-3-311. Advertising and design restrictions; vapor
products.

(a) No person shall market, advertise, sell or cause
to be sold an electronic cigarette or vapor material if the
electronic cigarette or vapor material's container,
packaging or advertising:

(i) Depicts a cartoon-like fictional character
that is primarily aimed at entertaining or enticing minors;

(ii) Imitates or mimics trademarks or images of
products that are typically marketed to minors;

(iii) Includes a symbol that is primarily used
to market products to minors; or

HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
(iv) Includes an image of a celebrity in a
manner that entices minors to purchase the product.

(b) No person shall market, advertise, sell or cause
to be sold an electronic cigarette or vapor material that
has entertainment features, such as the ability to play
games, play music or other audio, display photographs or
video or any similar electronic entertainment features.

(c) Any person who violates subsection (a) or (b) of
this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a
fine or not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00)
for a first violation, and by a fine of not more than one
thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00) for each
subsequent violation. Each sale of an electronic cigarette
or vapor material that violates subsection (a) or (b) of
this section shall constitute a separate offense under this
subsection.

39-18-112. Certification by manufacturers of
electronic cigarettes or vapor material.

HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
(a) Each nicotine product manufacturer that
manufactures electronic cigarettes or vapor material sold
at retail or to a consumer in this state, whether directly
or through a wholesaler, distributor, retailer or similar
intermediary, shall file a certification as required by
this section as a condition precedent to obtaining a
nicotine products manufacturer license under W.S.
39-16-106. The manufacturer shall not be issued a nicotine
product manufacturer license and shall not sell its
electronic cigarettes or vapor material in this state
unless the certification is filed as required by this
section.

(b) A certification filed under this section shall be
made on a form and in a manner prescribed by the
department. The certification shall include all of the
following:

(i) The name and address of the applicant, the
name and address of each of its members if the applicant is
a firm, partnership, limited liability company or
association or the name and address of each of its officers
HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
and the address of its principal place of business if the
applicant is a corporation;

(ii) The location of the applicant's principal
place of business if different from the address required by
paragraph (i) of this subsection. If the applicant has
multiple establishments, the applicant shall provide a list
of all establishments operated by the applicant;

(iii) A copy of the federal Prevent All
Cigarette Trafficking Act registration form as submitted by
the applicant to the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms
and explosives within the United States department of
justice and an attestation that the applicant is in
compliance with, and will continue to comply with, all
applicable requirements of 15 U.S.C. §§ 375 and 376, or a
statement explaining why the federal Prevent All Cigarette
Trafficking Act is not applicable to the applicant and its
products;

(iv) An attestation that the applicant will
comply with all applicable laws of Wyoming and of the
HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
county and municipality of the applicant's principal place
of business;

(v) A list of each type or model of electronic
cigarette and vapor material that the applicant sells in
this state, including each product name, product category,
nicotine content and total volume of the product;

(vi) An attestation that the electronic
cigarettes and vapor material the applicant is selling
within the state, as well as all components or parts of the
products, were manufactured within the United States or
imported, regardless of whether the importation was
accomplished by the manufacturer or another entity. The
applicant shall also obtain and submit copies of:

(A) All customs and border patrol entry
forms submitted in the six (6) months immediately preceding
the date of the application for each import entry of the
products or any components or parts of the products;

(B) If requested by the department,
commercial invoices, cargo release results reports, bills
HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
of lading and any other relevant document deemed necessary
by the department.

(vii) For an applicant with a principal place of
business outside the United States, a declaration and
notarized statement from each of the applicant's importers
that import electronic cigarettes and vapor material into
Wyoming that each importer accepts joint and several
liability with the applicant for all liability imposed
pursuant to this chapter, including any fees, costs,
attorney's fees and penalties. An importer who provides a
declaration and notarized statement under this paragraph
shall be provided the opportunity to consult with counsel
before providing the declaration and statement;

(viii) A list of any warning letters issued by
the United States food and drug administration during the
five (5) calendar years immediately preceding the date of
application that identified any electronic cigarette or
vapor material manufactured by the applicant as being
adulterated or misbranded under state or federal law and a
description of how and when each warning letter was
resolved;
HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421

(ix) Records reflecting the youth access
prevention policies the applicant has implemented with
respect to distributors and retailers that sell its
electronic cigarettes and vapor material in the state; and

(x) Any other information the department
requires for the purpose of administering this chapter or
any other applicable law.

(c) The applicant shall pay a one (1) time
nonrefundable fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each
type or model of electronic cigarette and vapor material
the first time it is included in the list of products
required by paragraph (b)(v) of this section.

(d) A nicotine product manufacturer shall not cause
to be sold at retail or to be consumed in this state any
electronic cigarette or vapor material not included in the
product list provided pursuant to paragraph (b)(v) of this
section.

HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
(e) Each nicotine product manufacturer that obtains a
license under this chapter shall submit to the department:

(i) Notice of any changes to its product list
required under paragraph (b)(v) of this section not later
than thirty (30) days after making the changes;

(ii) Not less than one (1) time every six (6)
months:

(A) Confirmation that the information
submitted in its license application remains accurate; and

(B) All customs and border protection entry
forms submitted in the previous six (6) months.

(f) Submission of a false certification under this
section constitutes a deceptive, misleading or unfair
business practice prohibited by the Wyoming Consumer
Protection Act and the attorney general may seek any remedy
available under that act.

HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
(g) The department may notify appropriate federal and
state agencies regarding false information submitted on a
certification form.

(h) A nicotine product manufacturer shall not be
certified under this section unless the manufacturer also
complies with the requirements of W.S. 39-18-113 through
39-18-115.

(j) Fees collected pursuant to this section are
continuously appropriated to the department to be expended
on the administration of this act.

39-18-113. Agent for service of process.

(a) Any nonresident manufacturer of electronic
cigarettes or vapor material that has not registered to do
business in this state as a foreign corporation or business
entity shall, as a condition precedent to receiving a
license under W.S. 39-18-106 and in addition to any
requirements under the Wyoming Business Corporation Act,
appoint and continually engage the services of an agent in
this state to act as agent for the service of process for
HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
legal actions concerning or arising out of the enforcement
of this chapter and who may be served in any manner
authorized by law. Service to an agent appointed under this
subsection shall constitute legal and valid service of
process on the manufacturer. The manufacturer shall provide
the agent's name, address, telephone number and proof of
the appointment and availability to the department and the
secretary of state.

(b) The manufacturer shall provide notice to the
department not less than thirty (30) calendar days before
the termination of the authority of an agent. The
manufacturer shall also provide proof to the department of
the appointment of a new agent not less than five (5)
calendar days before the termination of an existing agent
appointment.

39-18-114. Bond requirement; nonresident or foreign
manufacturers.

(a) Any nonresident or foreign manufacturer of
electronic cigarettes or vapor material that has not
registered to do business in this state as a foreign
HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
corporation or business entity shall, as a condition of
receiving a license under W.S. 39-18-106, submit to the
department a surety bond or other cash security payable to
the state in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000.00). The bond or cash security shall be posted by
a corporate surety located within the United States.

(b) The bond required by subsection (a) of this
section shall be conditioned on the manufacturer's
performance of all requirements and obligations imposed by
this chapter. A corporate surety on a manufacturer's bond
shall be liable up to the amount of the bond, and the
department may execute the surety bond, for the payment of
fines and penalties imposed on the manufacturer under this
chapter and for the cost of seizure and destruction of
products sold in violation of this chapter. If the
department executes on the surety bond, it may require the
manufacturer to provide an additional bond as a condition
of retaining the manufacturer or its products in the
directory created by W.S. 39-18-115.

(c) A corporate surety shall be released and
discharged from liability to the state sixty (60) days from
HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
the date after the corporate surety lodges a written
request to be released and discharged from its duties with
the department. This provision shall not apply to relieve,
release or discharge the corporate surety from liability
already accrued or that shall accrue before the expiration
of the sixty (60) day period. The department shall, upon
receiving a request under this subsection, notify the
manufacturer who furnished the bond. Unless the
manufacturer files a new bond and a new corporate surety
with the department before the sixty (60) day period has
expired, the department shall cancel the manufacturer's
nicotine product manufacturer license.

39-18-115. Directory of electronic cigarette or vapor
material.

(a) Beginning on October 1, 2026, the department
shall maintain and make publicly available on the
department's official website a directory that lists all
electronic cigarettes and vapor material included in the
product lists submitted by licensed nicotine product
manufacturers pursuant to W.S. 39-18-112.

HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2027, electronic
cigarettes and vapor material not included in the directory
shall not be sold for retail sale or to a consumer in this
state, either directly or through an importer, distributor,
wholesaler, retailer or similar intermediary.

(c) Any person who sells an electronic cigarette or
vapor material in violation of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven
hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for a first violation, and
by a fine of not more than one thousand five hundred
dollars ($1,500.00) for each subsequent violation. Each
sale of an electronic cigarette or vapor material in
violation of this section shall constitute a separate
offense under this subsection.

(d) A second or subsequent violation of this section
shall constitute a deceptive, misleading or unfair trade
practice prohibited by the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act
and the attorney general may seek any remedy available
under that act. Each sale of an electronic cigarette or
vapor material shall constitute a separate offense under
this subsection.
HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421

Section 2. W.S. 39-18-101(a)(v)(D) and by creating a
new paragraph (xii), 39-18-106(a) and by creating new
subsections (d) through (g) and 39-18-108(c) by creating a
new paragraph (xiii) and by creating a new subsection (f)
are amended to read:

39-18-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article chapter:

(v) "Wholesaler" means any person who:

(D) Sells or distributes for sale or resale
cigarettes or nicotine products over the internet or
through any other means of direct or indirect mail
solicitation or delivery to any person in this state.

(xii) "Nicotine product manufacturer" means any
person who manufactures, fabricates, assembles, processes
or labels a finished nicotine product for sale in this
state. "Nicotine product manufacturer" shall not include a
cigarette manufacturer.
HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421

39-18-106. Licensing; permits.

(a) Every wholesaler, cigarette importer, nicotine
manufacturer and cigarette manufacturer who sells or offers
to sell nicotine products in this state must shall have a
license to do so issued by the department. No license or
renewal of a license shall be granted under this section
unless the wholesaler states in writing, under penalty for
false swearing, that he shall comply fully with W.S.
9-4-1201 through 9-4-1209. The license fee is ten dollars
($10.00) per year or fraction thereof and is valid through
June 30 in each year. The license will be granted only to
wholesalers who own or operate the place from which sales
are made and additional licenses must be obtained for each
separate location. The licenses are transferable pursuant
to rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

(d) No license for a nicotine product manufacturer
who manufactures electronic cigarettes or vapor material
shall be granted, maintained or renewed unless the
manufacturer satisfies the requirements of W.S. 39-18-112
through 39-18-115.
HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421

(e) Retailers shall purchase cigarettes and nicotine
products only from a wholesaler, nicotine product
manufacturer or cigarette importer who is licensed under
this chapter.

(f) Wholesalers and cigarette importers shall
purchase cigarettes and nicotine products only from a
wholesaler or cigarette manufacturer who is licensed under
this chapter.

(g) A person licensed under this chapter shall be
deemed to have sufficient minimum contacts with the state
pursuant to W.S. 5-1-107 and shall consent to the exercise
of personal jurisdiction over the manufacturer in the
courts of this state in any matter or issue arising under
this chapter or related to the sale of cigarettes or a
nicotine product.

39-18-108. Enforcement.

(c) Penalties. The following shall apply:

HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
(xiii) Beginning January 1, 2027, any nicotine
product held or offered for retail sale in this state that
is manufactured by a person that has not received a
nicotine product manufacturer license as provided by this
chapter shall be considered contraband goods and may be
seized without a warrant by the department or any law
enforcement officer in this state when directed to do so by
the department. The cost of the seizure and destruction or
disposal shall be borne by the person from whom the
products are confiscated.

(f) Each retailer, distributor and wholesaler that
sells or distributes electronic cigarettes or vapor
material in this state is subject to unannounced compliance
checks for the purpose of enforcing this section.
Unannounced follow-up compliance checks of all noncompliant
retailers, distributors and wholesalers shall be conducted
within thirty (30) days after any violation of this
chapter. The department shall publish the results of all
compliance checks on its website not less than annually and
shall make the results available to the public upon
request.

HB0132

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0421
Section 3. The department of revenue shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0132